Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ADMINISTRATION BUILDING.new text end new text begin $255,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to paint the Department of Administration building parking ramp and install new grates. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end